hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-af.pat.txt
.af1
f2ri1ca
f2ri1ka
.af2o1r
.ag1te
.agter1uit
.an1ti1
.be1
.be2d1l
.be2d1s
be4e
be2l.
be1la
be1le
be1li
be1lo
be1lu
be2ld
be2n1de
be2n1s
.as1be2s3
.as1b
be2r
be3ra
be3re
be3ri
be3ro
be3ru
be3ry
be2s1g
.er1
.er2e1
.er2i1
.er2o1
.er2u1
.er2ts1
.er2t1s2e
.per1
.pe1r2a
.pe1r2e
.pe1r2i
.pe1r2o
.pe1r2u
.per2s
1ties.
1tie1se.
ve2r1
ve2r1a2
ve2r2e4
ve2r3ee
ve3r4end
ve2r3e4ni
ve2r3effen
ve2r3er
ve2r3eis
ve2r3eu
ve5r4e.
ve3r2i
ve4r3inne
ve4r3itali1aans
ve2r1ont3
ve4r3uit
he2r1
he2r2a
he2r2e
he3rent.
he3ren1te.
he3ren1tes.
her4fs1
he1r2ing
.he4r5ing
he1r2o
he2r3ont1
he2r1uit1
.i1m2a
.i1m2i
.im1
.in3
.i1n4er1
.i1n4i1
.in4k3b
.in4k3p
.in4k3s
.in4k3t
.in4k3v
.in4s3gelyk
.on1
.o1n2ik
.o2n1in1ge
n4s.
1on2t1
on3t2a
on4t3aar
on2t2e
.on2t3eer
.on2t3ei
.on2t3e2r
on2t2i
on2t2o
.on3t2o
on2t2u
on3t2uu
on2t2y
3on2t1d
3on2t1l
o4on2t1l
3on2t1ru
3on2t1st
3on2t1t
on1t2o1ring
3on2t1pl
3on2t1w
4s1ont1
5s2on3ta
b2ont
bon1te
d2ont
don1te
f2on3tein
fron1te
k2ont
kon1te
a2k3ont1
l2ont
lon1te
kl4ont
klon1te
a2l3ont1
e2l3ont1
i2l3ont1
o2l3ont1
u2l3ont1
m2ont
mon1te
o2on1te
p2ont
r2ont
fr4ont
t2ont
ton1te
on2t3h
n4t.
1ge1
ge2e
ge2i
ge2i1ger1
ge2l
ge3la
ge3le
ge3li
ge3lo
ge3lu
ge3ly
ge2n
ge3na
ge3ne
ge3ni
ge3no
ge3nu
ge2m
ge3ma
ge3me
ge3mi
ge3mo
ge3mu
ge3my
ge2nt
ge2r
ge3r2a
ge3r2e
ge3r2i
ge3r2o
ge3r2u
ge3r2y
win1ge2r2d1
win1ge
ge2r3de
ge2r2s
ge2s1pe.
.na1ge1
mis1
mi1s2a
mi1s2e
mi1s2i
mi1s2o
.om1
.om2a
.om2e
.om2i
hie2r3
.ui2t1
.ui2t1een
.ui3t2en1h
.ui3t2er
baar3de
baar4d
3baar3
1ba1re
by1
by2n
by3n2a
by3n2e
by3n2i
.by2t1s
by2s1ter
3dom.
1liet
1lik
b2lik
1li1ke
p2li1ka
3lik3he
5he3de
3heid1
hei1d2e
hei1d2i
heid2s1
heid5s4er1ti1
3loos.
1lo1se.
1naar
s2naar
3ryk.
3ry1ke.
3ry1ker.
3ry1kes.
n5k6ryk
1têr
.toe1
.toe2n1
.toe3n2a
.toe3n2e
.toe2ts1
.toe2r1
.toe3r2a
.toe3r2e
.toe3r2i
.toe3r2o
.toe4r3ou
.toe3r2u
.toe3r2y
1mal
s2mal
’5t2ji
m3pie.
aa2n1tji
ant1ji
jan1t2ji
man1t2ji
een1tji
ein1tji
eon1tji
eun1tji
iënt1ji
oen1tji
oon1tji
uen1tji
uin1tji
yn1tji
ar1tjie
kaar1t2ji
vaar1t2ji
smar1t2ji
har1t2ji
kwar2t1ji
eer1tji
eur1tji
be4ur2t1ji
be4u
koor1tji
oer1tji
oir1tji
uer1tji
uur1tji
buur2t1ji
aat3ji
ai1tji
ei1tji
eu1tji
ia1tji
fia2t1ji
fi1a
lia2t1ji
li1a
io1tji
atriot1ji
nge1tjie
oa1tji
oet1ji
oot3ji
ue1tji
due2t1ji
nue2t1ji
uit1ji
.ui3t2ji
bui1t2ji
krui1t2ji
trui1t2ji
uut1jie
4b5b4
4c5c4
4d3d4
ei5s2te4d4d5
eis1te
ei1s2tee
4f3f2
4f4f.
4f4f3d
4f4f3m
4f4fs
4f4f3w
4g5g4
4ghg4
4k5k4
4l3l4a
4l4l1c
4l4l1d
4l3l4e
4l4l1g
4l3l4i
4l4l1p
4l3l4o
4l4l1r
4l4ls
4l3l4u
4l4l1v
4l3l4y
4m5m4
4n3n4
4n4n.
4n4n5l
4n4n5h
4n4n5r
4n4ns
4n4n5v
4n4n5w
4p5p4
4r5r4
4s5s4
4t5t4
4w5w4
4z3z2
jaz4z3
5ä
5ë
5ï
5ö
5ü
ê3e
ê4r
ê5re
û3e
ô3e
2b1d2
2b1f2
2b1g2
2b1h2
2b1j2
2b1k2
1b2l2
ro2b3ler
i2b3ler
2b1m2
2b1n2
2b1p2
1b2r
su2b3
su3b4iet
su3b4li
gesu3b4iet
gesu3b4li
b2s.
b1s
b2s1b
b2s1d
b1t
b1v
b1w
c2h
1c2hr
1ch2a
1ch2e
è2che
1ch2é
1ch2i
1ch4o
1ch2u
1ch2y
c2i
c2l
c2k
c2r
c1t
1c2e
4o4r4c4e4s1
2d1b2
2d1c2
2d1f2
2d1g2
rid4ge
2d1h
2d1j2
.d2j
abi1d2jan
i1li1man1d2ja1ro
mo1d2ja1d2ji
2d1k2
2d1l2
2d1m2
2d1n2
2d1p2
d1saa
d1se.
d1sy
d2s1ywer
d2s1ys1ter
2d1t2
2d2t3p
2d1v2
2d1w2
3d2waal
3d2waas
3d2weil
3d2werg1
3d2wer1g2i
3d2welm
3d2wing
3d2wong
2d1wu
r3d2wyn
f1b
2f2d.
f1d
f1g
f1h
f1j
f1k
f1m
f1n
f2n2ui2k
2f1p2
f1ro
f1rok1k
1f2r4ok1ki
f2s1f
f1t
f2t.
delf2t
f2talaat
f1v
f1w
g3b
g1da
g1de
g1di
g1do
g1dr
g1du
g1dy
g2d1h
g1f
g1h
.g4h
g4hi1ta
g4het1to
g4holf
g4hong
g4hries
g4hwa1no
g4hwar
sor1g4hum
da1g4ha
g4hai
g4hie
2g3j2
2g3k2
2g1lê1
g1lu
g2lun
g2luu
2g3m2
2g3n2
2g3p2
2g3t2
g4th
g4t.
g1w
g1z
1h4
2k3b2
2k3d2
2k3f2
2k1g2
2k1h2
2k1j2
1kle
2k1leer.
2k1leer1d
2k1leer1l
2k1lei1er
ba3k2lei1e
ba1kle
2k1len
2k1leun
2k1le1we1ri
1kle1we
e1k2li
2k3lig
2k3lik
1klo
2k1lo1ka
2k1loop
si3k2loop
si1klo
2k1lo1per
1klo1pe
2k1loos
3k2loos1t
2k1lo1r
3k2lo1ra
2k1los
l3k2los
s3k2los
t3k2los
1klu
2k1lui.
2k1luid
2k1lui1e
2k1lus
3si3k2lus
oo2k1l
n2k1lug
n1klu
u2k1lug
u1klu
3k2lu1si
2k1m2
2k1p2
k1sa
k2s1aan
k1se
k2s1een
k2s1er1v
k1si
k2s1in1k
k2s1in1s
k1so
k2s1om1d
k2s1om1g
k2s1om1s
k2s1on
k3s2on.
k3s2on1b
k3s2o1no
k2s1oond
k2s1oor
k3s2oort
k4s3oor1tr
k2s1op1
k3s2op.
2k4t.
2k4t3v
2k4t3l
2k4t3h
2k3t2
2k1v2
luk1w
k1wag1t
1kwo
2k1w2oe
2k1w2or
3k2w2o1ru
k1wu
k1wys
l1b
l1c
l2d.
l1da
l2d1aan1b
l2d1af1
l3de
l1di
l2d1in
l3d2in.
l3d2ing
l3d2i1na
l3d2in1n
l1do
l2d1of
l2d1oor1d
l2d1oor1l
l2d1oor1s
l1du
l2d1uit1
l1dy
l2d1ys
.hal2f1
.hal2f1e2
.hal3f2i
.hal2f1u2
sel2f3
l1fa
l1fe
l3f4ees
l2f1eeu1
l2f1erts
l1fi
l1fo
sel3f6oon
sel3f6one
l2f1oond
l2f1o2p1o
l1fu
l2f1uu
l1fy
l1ga
l2g3b
l1ge
l1gê
2l1gi
l1go
l2g1or1de.
l2g1or1des
l1gor1d
l1gr
2l3h2
2l3j2
2l4k.
l2k3t
2l1ka
2l1ke
2l1ki
2l1ko
2l1ku
2l1ky
l1ma
l2m1af1
l1me
l1mi
l1mo
l2m1op
l3m2ops
l1mu
l1my
2l1n
l1p
ulp1b
ulp1d
ul1pe
ulp1f
ulp1g
ulp1h
ul1pi
ulp1j
ulp1k
ulp1l
ul1p2la
ulp1m
ulp1n
ulp1p
ulp1r
ulp1s
wulp2s1
wulp3s2e
wulp3s2te
ulp1t
ul1pu
ulp1v
ulp1w
ulp1z
l1r
2l1t
2l2t1s
.al2t1
.al3t2a
.al3t2e
.al3t2i
.al3t2y
fal2t
fal3teer
l2t.
l1v
l1w
m1b
m1c
m2d.
m1d
m2d1h
m1f
nim2f
triom2f
lim2f
m1g
m1h
m1j
m1k
m1l
m1n
aam1p
m1pa
m1pe
m1pi
m1pl
m1po
m1pr
m2p1rok
m1pu
m1py
m1r
m1sa
m2s1ak1t
m2s1ap1p
m1se
m2s1e2s
m1si
m1so
m2s1oe
m2s1om
m2s1op
m2s1or
m1sta
m1ste
m1sti
m2s3tig
m1sto
m1stu
m1su
m1t
m1v
m1w
n1b
n1c
san2c
n4d.
n1da
n2d1aan1
n3d2aan.
n1de
n1dê
n1di
n1do
on4d1om
on5d2o1me
on1do
n2d1ont
n2d1op1b
n2d1op1n
n2d1op1l
n3d2op1lu
n2d1op1p
n2d1op1s
n1du
n1dy
n1dra
nd1rat
nd1rand
nd1re
n1d2rea
n1d2rew
n1dri
n2d1riem
n2d1rigt
n1dru
n2d1rug
n2d1ruit
n1dry
n2d1ry.
n2d1ryk
n2d1rym
n1f
n1ga
n2g1aa
n3g2aan
man5g4a4a4n1
man1ga
n4g3aanb
n4g3aand
n4g3aan1h
n4g3aan1v
n4g3aan1w
n2g1af
on3g2aar
n1ge1
n1gi
n1go
n2g1oef
tin2g1o
n2g1on
n2g1oo
n3g2ooi
n2g1ou
ng1se
n1gu
n2g1uit
aan5g4
een5g4
.in5g4aan
oon5g4
n1gl
n2g1lik
an2g1l
an3g2li
an3g2lo
in2g1l
in2g2las
.in1g2l
jon2g1l
ton2g1l
n1h
n1j
n1ka
n2k1aan1va
n1ke
n2k1e2f1f
n2k1eien
n2k1ele
n2k1eks3
n1ki
n2k1in1h
n2k1in1s
n1kli
n2k1lied
n2k1lik
nk1s
nk2s1h
nk2s1om1
oen1k
n1l
n1m
n1p
n1r
n1sa
n2s1amp
n2s1aap
n1se
n2s1eie
n2s1er1va1r
n1ser1v
n1si
n2s1in1r
n1so
n2s1oog1
n2s1oord
n2s1oor1g
n2s1oor.
n2s1op1
n1su
n2s1uit1
n2s1ui1t2i
n1sy
n1ta
n2t1aar
n3t2aar.
n3t2aar1v
n2t1as1s
n1te
n2t1een1h
n1ti
n2t1in1n
n2t1in1s
n1to
n2t1ont1
n2t1ope
n2t1op1n
n2t1op1p
n2t1op1r
n2t1op1s
n1tru
n2t1rub
nt1sa
nt1se
nt1si
nt1so
nt1su
nt1sy
n4t3aan1v
n3t2aan
n1tu
n2t1uit1
n3t2ui1t2i
n1ty
n1v
n1w
n1z
2p1b2
2p1c2
2p1d2
2p1f2
2p1g2
2p1h2
2p1j2
2p1k2
1pla
2p1lam
3p2la1mu
2p2land
2p1lap
2p1m2
2p1n2
p2neu1ma1
p2neu1mo1
p1sel
2p1t2
p2t3heid
.p2t
2p1v2
2p1w2
2r3b2
2r3c2
r1da
aar2da
2r1de
aar2de
2r1di
2r1do
aar2do
2r2du
aar2du
r1dr
2r1dy
2r1f2
2r2f.
e2r2f
oe2r3f
ë2r2f
ve2r2f1
ve4r5f4erm
ve4r5f4ilm
ve4r5f4lou
ve4r5f4rom
ve4r5f4oe
ve4r5f4om
ve4r5f4raai
ve4r5f4rans
ve4r5f4ris
ve4r5f4yn
wer4f
dur4f
kor4f
mur4f
skur4f
tur4f
2r1g2
2r2g3lu
2r2g.
ar2g1l
ar2g1w
ar1g
r2g1d
r2g2d.
bo2r2g
bor3ge
so2r2g
sor3ge
be2r2g1
be2r3g2e
be2r4g3eng
bu2r2g
bur3ge
mu2r2g
mur3gie
wu2r2g
2r1h2
r4ho1desi
2r1j2
r1ka
r2k1aan1b
r2k1aan1d
r2k1aan1w
r2k1adre
r1ke
r2k1er1va1r
r1ker1v
r1ki
r2k1in1l
r2k1in1s
r3k2in1so
r1kli
r2k1lid
r2k1lied
r2k1lik.
r2k1li1ke
r2k1li2k1h
r1klik
r1ko
ar2k1oor
ar3k2oord
ar1ko
r2k1op1d
r2k1op1na
r2k1op1er1
r1kop1p
r2k1op1s
r1ku
r2k1uit1
r1ky
r2k1y2w
2r1l
paar2l
ier1m
r1ma
r2m1aan1h
r2m1af1d
r2m1af1s
r1me
r2m1en1gel
r1mi
r1mo
r2m1ont1
r3m2ont.
r3m2on1t2a
r1mu
r1my
r2n.
2r1n2
2r2n3s2t2
t2oor2n
ker2n
ker3ny
lan1ter2n
lan1te
lu1ser2n
r1p
2r1pr
dor2p
dor3pe
or1p
or2ps
or2p1sie
r2p1s
r2p2s1h
r2p2s1v
r3p2si1g
r4p3si2g.
r1sa
r2s1aar1
r2s1af1
r2s1ad1v
r2s1ak1t
r1si
r2s1in1du
r2s1in1m
r2s1in1ko
2r1su
r1sy
r1ta
r2t1aan1d
r2t1aan1v
2r1t2e
2r2t3eend
2r2t3eeu
2r1t2i
2r1v2
2r1w2
2r2z.
2r1z2
s3b
.s4c
s4ch
2s1d
s2d3h
s4d.
2s1f
s2feer
s2fer
2s3g2
s1h
.s2h
s2h.
s1ju
1slaa
2s2laag
is1m
s1pu
1s2pu.
1s2pul
1s2puis
1s2puit
1s2puug
2s1r
s1te
s1w
1s2waai
1s2wael
1s2war2t1
1s2war3t2e
1s2war4t3ee
1s2war3t2i
1s2wam
1s2weef
2s3weef1sel
1s2weet
1s2weis
1s2wem
1s2wel
2s3wel1syn
1s2wenk
1s2werf
1s2werm
1s2we1we
1s2woeg
1s2wik
1s2wyg
2t1b
t1c
t2ch.
2t3d
2t1f
2t1g
r4t1g
2t1h
eat2h
t2h.
e2t2h1le
et1h
.et2h
be1t2h
be2t3hal
be2t3hel
a1t2hen
m3t2h
3t2ha.
3t2he.
3t2hi.
3t2ho.
3t2hu.
3t2hy.
t1j
t2ji
t2je
1tjek
uit3j
2t1k2
2t1l2
2t3m2
2t1n2
2t1p2
2t1v2
.t2wak
2t1wa
t1wi
t2win
t3wind
t2wis
1uit1wis
2t1wo
t1wy
t2wy1fel
t2wyn
3v4
w1b
w1c
w1d
w1f
w1g
w1h
1w2his1ky
w1j
w1l
w2n
w1p
1wri
o2w1r
w1s
touw2s1ri1vier
louw2s1burg
w1t
1z2
hert2z
a4a4
a3e
a4i
a3o
a2u
e1a
e4e
e4i
e3o
e4o1g
e5o2g1g
e2u
i3a
i2e
i3i
i3o
i4o1g
i3u
o3a
o4e
o4i
o4o2
o4u
u3a
u3e
u2i
u3o
u4u4
a4a4i
a4i3e
a4i2d
a4i3de
a4i3du
a4i3do
au1e
ei1e
s3ei2er.
s3ei2ers.
e4e4u
e4e4u3i
e4e4u2s
e4e4u3se
e3ui
i4e4uing
i3ee
i1eu
i2e3ui
i2eu.
ni2eu
ki2eu
i2e3uu
o4e4i1
o4e4i1s2
oei2d.
boei4ng
oi3e
o4o4i1
mooi2s.
kooi2s
ooi2t.
ou3i
u2i3e
y1aa
y1er
y1ee
y1o
ny2o
a1y2o
y1u
ny2u
ie1b
a1ba
a1be
a1bi
a1bo
a1bu
a1by
e1ba
e1be
e1bi
e1bo
e2b1ont1
e3b2ont.
e1bu
e1by
i1ba
i1be
i1bi
i1bo
i1bu
i1by
o1ba
ô1ba
o1be
o1bi
o1bo
o1bu
o1by
u1ba
u2bagt
u1be
u1bi
u1bo
u1bu
u1by
y1ba
y1be
y1bi
y1bo
y1bu
y1by
a1ce
a1ci
a1co
a1cu
e1ca
e1ce
e1ci
e1co
e1cu
e1cy
i1ca
i1ce
i1ci
i1co
i1cu
o1ca
o1ce
o1ci
o1co
o1cu
u1ca
u1ce
u1ci
u1co
u1cu
y1co
a1da
aa2d1a
a2d1aa
a1ma3d2aa
a1de
aa2d1e2
a1di
aa2d1i
a1do
aa2d1o
a1du
aa2d1u
a2d1uit1
a1dy
e1da
ee2d1af
ee2d1aar
ee1da
e1de
e1di
e1do
e1du
e2d1uit1n
i1da
i1de
si2de.
si1de
k1si3de
i1di
i1do
ui2d1o
i1du
i2d1uit1
o1da
oo2d1a
o1de
oo2d1e
roo3d2e
broo4d3e
o1di
o1do
oo2d1o
o1du
o2d1uit1
u1da
u1de
u1di
u1do
u1du
u2d1uit1
y1da
y1de
y1di
y1do
y2d1oog
a1fa
a2f1aard
a1fe
aa2f1e2
a1fi
a1fo
aa2f1o2
a2f1oor1
a2f1oef
a3f2oe1fel
a1fu
a2f1uu
a1fy
e1fa
oe2f1a
toe3f2a
e1fe
e1fi
ee2f1i
e1fo
e2f1ont1
e3f2on1t2ei
e1fu
e2f1uit1
ef1y
i1fa
i2f1aa
i3f2aal
i3f2aat
gi2f1a
ui2f1a
i2f1ar
i1fe
i2f1eend
i2f1ei
i1fi
skri2f1i
i1fo
i1fu
i2f1uit1
o1fa
oo2f1a
ho2f1a
ho2f1aan1
o2f1ad
o1fe
oo2f1e2
o1fi
oo2f1i2
o2f1in1
o1fo
o2f1ooi
oo2f1o
o1fu
o2f1ui
o1fy
u1fa
u1fe
u1fi
u1fo
u1fu
yf1a
ay1f2a
sy1f2a
y1fe
y2f1ei
3s2y1fe
y1fi
y2f1oes
y2f1olie
y2f1or
yf1u
yf1y
e1pa
ee2pa
a1ga
aa2g1a2
a2g1aan
a3g2aan.
a2g1aar
a2g1are
1a2gaat1
a2g1af
a1ge
a2g1een
1a2gent
a2ge.
sa3ge.
ha3ge.
a1gi
a2g1in1s
a1go
aa2g1o2
a2g1ont1
a2g1oor
a2g1o2p
sa3g2o3
a2g1ogg
a2g1oud
a1gu
aa2g1u
a2g1ui
a2g1uu
a2g1y
e1ga
e2g1aand.
e1ge
lee2g1e2
e2g1eie
e1gi
e5g2if
ee2g1in
e1go
ee2g1o
e2g1on1g
e2g1oor1
e2g1op1
e1gu
e2g1uit1
eg1y
i1ga
i2g3aan1
i2g1aard
.si3g2aar3
.si1ga
i1ge
i1gi
.li2g1i
i1go
ui2g1o2
ig2oon
i2g1ont1
i2g1op1t
i1gu
ig1y
o1ga
oo2g1a2
o1ge
oo2g1e2
o2g1eens.
o1gi
oo2g1i2
o1go
oo2g1o2
o1gu
oo2g1u
u1ga
u2g1aan
u2g1aar
u2g1aas
u2g1ad
u2g1af
u1ge
u1gi
eu2gi
ug1o2
ou1g2o
eu1g2o
u1gu
y1ga
y1ge
y1gi
y1go
a1j
e1j
i1j
o1j
u1j
y1j
a1ka
aa2k1a
a2k1aan
a2k3ad1v
a1ke
aa2k1e
a1ki
a1ko
aa2k1o
a2k1oes.
a2k1oes1te.
a2k1oond
a1ku
a2k1uit1
a1ky
e1ka
e2k1aan1
e3k2aan.
e3k2aans
e1ke
e2k1eend
e1ker1v
e2k1er1va
oe2k1ei
oe1ke
e1ki
e1ko
e1ku
e2k1uit1
e2k1uur.
e1ky
ee2k1y
i1ka
ui2k1a2
i2k1aan1j
i1ke
i1ki
i1ko
i2k1oop1m
i1ku
i2k1uit1
o1ka
o2k1aan1
o2k1aart1
oo2k1a2
oo3k2a.
o1ke
oo2k1e
o1ki
o2k1in1s
oo2k1i
o1ko
o2k1ou
oo2k1o
o2k1oo
o1ku
oo2k1u
o2k1uit1
o1ky
u1ka
u1ke
u2k1eti
u1ki
u2k1in
u3k2ing
u1ko
u2k1ont1
ou3k2o
u2k1op1h
u1ku
y1ka
y2k1aard
y1ke
y1ki
y2k1in
y3k2ing
y1ko
ly2k1o
y1ku
aa2l1
aa2l2s
aal3sa
aal3se
aal3si
aal3so
aal3su
aal3sy
twaal4f1
aa2l2s1g
aa2l3spr
a1la
aa2l1a2
a1le
aa2l1e2
a1li
aa2l1i2
a1lo
a1lô
aa2l1o2
a1lu
aa2l1u2
a1ly
aa2l1y2
e1la
ee2l1a
e2l1aan
e3l2aan.
e3l2aans.
e2l1ad1m
e2l1ad1v
e2l1af
e1le
e3lê1
tee2l1eend
vee2l1eis
we1le
we2l1ee
te1le3
tele4e
tele4k2s1
tele4k3s2e
tele4rs
tele4nd
e1li
e2l1i2tem
e1li1te
e2l1inb
e2l1ind
e2l1inh
e2l1inl
e2l1inr
e2l1ins
e2l1in1v
e1lo
ee2l1o
ee3l2ood
ee3l2oon
ee3l2one
ee3l2oot
ee2l3open
ee3l2oper
ee2l2oop
ee2l2ooi
e2l1oor
e2l1op
e3l2o1pe
e3l2o1pi
e1lu
e2l1uu
e3l2uuks
ee2l2u
e1ly
i1la
ui2l1aa
i1le
i1li
i1lo
i1lu
i1ly
o1la
oo2l1a
o1le
o1lê
oo2l1e
vo1le
vo2l1ei
o1li
oo2l1i
1po1li
so1li
o1lo
oo2l1o
vo2l1o
kar1bo2l1op1
o1lu
oo2l1u
.vo2l1uit
.vo1lu1m
.vo1l2uut
o1ly
u1la
u1le
u1lê
jou2le
u1li
u1lo
u1lu
u1ly
y1la
y1le
y1li
y1lo
y1lu
y1ly
a1ma
aa2m1a
a1me
aa2m1e
a1mi
aa2m1i
a1mo
aa2m1o
a1mu
aa2m1u
a1my
e1ma
e2m1afd
e2m1afr
e2m1afs
e1me
ee2m1e4
e1mi
e1mo
e1mô
e1mu
e1my
i1ma
i1me
i1mê
i1mi
i1mo
i2m1op
i1mu
i1my
o1ma
oo2m1a
